Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3320
Board; purpose.

The purpose of the board is to: (1) Provide for the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens; (2) insure that veterinarians and veterinary technicians serving the public meet minimum standards of proficiency and competency; (3) insure that schools of veterinary medicine and surgery and veterinary technician programs meet the educational needs of the students and qualify students to serve the public in a safe and efficient manner; and (4) control the field of veterinary medicine and surgery in the interest of consumer protection.

Laws 1979, LB 96, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 127;

Laws 2000, LB 833, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,152.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1102.